Utah statutes.
19-4-110.   Local jurisdiction over water supply systems.

Nothing in this chapter alters the authority of local jurisdictions to control water supply systems within the local jurisdiction provided that any local laws, ordinances, or rules and regulations are not inconsistent with this chapter and rules made under authority of this chapter.

